Nevada, session 83, SB321.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 704.595 is hereby amended to read as follows:
704.595 1. Any person who violates any provision of any
regulation adopted by the Commission in conformity with the
Natural Gas Pipeline Safety Act of 1968, as amended, 49 U.S.C. §§
60101 et seq., or with a federal regulation adopted pursuant thereto,
is subject to a civil penalty in an amount that may not [to exceed
$200,000 for each violation for each day that the violation persists,
but the maximum civil penalty must not exceed $2,000,000 for any
related series of violations. Unless compromised, the amount of any
such civil penalty must be determined by a court of competent
jurisdiction.] be greater than the monetary amount of the
corresponding civil penalty for the applicable violation pursuant to
49 U.S.C. § 60122(a), including any adjustments made to the civil
penalty pursuant to the Federal Civil Penalties Inflation
Adjustment Act Improvements Act of 2015, Pub. L. 114-74.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
2. Any civil penalty may be compromised by the Commission.
In determining the amount of the penalty, or the amount agreed
upon in compromise, the appropriateness of the penalty to the size
of the business of the person charged, the gravity of the violation,
and the good faith of the person charged in attempting to achieve
compliance, after notification of a violation, must be considered.
3. The amount of the penalty, [when finally determined,] or the
amount agreed upon in compromise, [may be deducted from any
sum owing by the State to the person charged or] may be recovered
in a civil action in any court of competent jurisdiction.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)